apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="Francuz__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owi</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pogrz/yb__n">
  <e>       <p><l>yb</l>        <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebu</l>       <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebowi</l>     <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yb</l>        <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebym</l>      <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebie</l>      <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebie</l>      <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eby</l>       <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebōw</l>      <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebōm</l>      <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eby</l>       <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebami</l>     <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebach</l>     <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eby</l>       <r>yb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Afganistan__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owi</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="chrz/est__n">
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tu</l>        <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>towi</l>      <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tym</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ty</l>        <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tōw</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tōm</l>       <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ty</l>        <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tami</l>      <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tach</l>      <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ty</l>        <r>est<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="socjali/zm__n">
  <e>       <p><l>zm</l>        <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmu</l>       <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmowi</l>     <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmus</l>      <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmym</l>      <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źmie</l>      <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źmie</l>      <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>zmy</l>       <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmōw</l>      <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmōm</l>      <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmy</l>       <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmami</l>     <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmach</l>     <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zmy</l>       <r>zm<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gr/ōb__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ōb</l>        <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obu</l>       <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obowi</l>     <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōb</l>        <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obym</l>      <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obie</l>      <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obie</l>      <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oby</l>       <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obōw</l>      <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obōm</l>      <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oby</l>       <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obami</l>     <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>obach</l>     <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oby</l>       <r>ōb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="alkoholizm">    <i>alkoholi</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="anglofilizm">   <i>anglofili</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="antysowietyzm"> <i>antysowiety</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="attycyzm">      <i>attycy</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="cezaryzm">      <i>cezary</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="chrzest">         <i>chrz</i><par n="chrz/est__n"/></e>
<e lm="dekadyntyzm">   <i>dekadynty</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="dynamōmetamorfizm"><i>dynamōmetamorfi</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="ekshibicjōnizm"><i>ekshibicjōni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="eudymōnizm">    <i>eudymōni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="filōmatyzm">    <i>filōmaty</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="galicjanizm">   <i>galicjani</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="grōb">            <i>gr</i><par n="gr/ōb__n"/></e>
<e lm="gōnochoryzm">   <i>gōnochory</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiperbolizm">   <i>hiperboli</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="idiografizm">   <i>idiografi</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="indyferyntyzm"> <i>indyferynty</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="izosylabizm">   <i>izosylabi</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="kataplazm">     <i>katapla</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="kresowizm">     <i>kresowi</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="kōnkretyzm">    <i>kōnkrety</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="logicyzm">      <i>logicy</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="metabolizm">    <i>metaboli</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="nacjonalizm">   <i>nacjonali</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="noktambulizm">  <i>noktambuli</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="pigmaliōnizm">  <i>pigmaliōni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="pogrzyb">         <i>pogrz</i><par n="pogrz/yb__n"/></e>
<e lm="protekcjōnizm"> <i>protekcjōni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="saintsimōnizm"> <i>saintsimōni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="sunnizm">       <i>sunni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="teutōnizm">     <i>teutōni</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="werbalizm">     <i>werbali</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="ôrgiazm">       <i>ôrgia</i><par n="socjali/zm__n"/></e>
<e lm="Rzim">            <i>Rzim</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Azerbejdżan">     <i>Azerbejdżan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bahrajn">         <i>Bahrajn</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barbados">        <i>Barbados</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bhutan">          <i>Bhutan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bynin">           <i>Bynin</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gabōn">           <i>Gabōn</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Guam">            <i>Guam</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hōnduras">        <i>Hōnduras</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iran">            <i>Iran</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jymyn">           <i>Jymyn</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kamerun">         <i>Kamerun</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kazachstan">      <i>Kazachstan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kirgistan">       <i>Kirgistan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Laos">            <i>Laos</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Liban">           <i>Liban</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Liechtenstein">   <i>Liechtenstein</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mauritius">       <i>Mauritius</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pakistan">        <i>Pakistan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sudan">           <i>Sudan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Surinam">         <i>Surinam</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tadżykistan">     <i>Tadżykistan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tajwan">          <i>Tajwan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Turkmynistan">    <i>Turkmynistan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Uzbekistan">      <i>Uzbekistan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wallis">          <i>Wallis</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Watykan">         <i>Watykan</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wietnam">         <i>Wietnam</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ōman">            <i>Ōman</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dublin">          <i>Dublin</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Francuz">         <i>Francuz</i><par n="Francuz__n"/></e>
<e lm="spusōb">          <i>spus</i><par n="gr/ōb__n"/></e>
<e lm="bōb">             <i>b</i><par n="gr/ōb__n"/></e>
